Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.310

Powers relative to planning.

If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan comprehensive planning, it shall have the following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To prepare a recommended comprehensive land use and capital facilities plan for the metropolitan area.

(2) To review proposed zoning ordinances and resolutions or comprehensive plans of component cities and counties and make recommendations thereon. Such proposed zoning ordinances and resolutions or comprehensive plans must be submitted to the metropolitan council prior to adoption and may not be adopted until reviewed and returned by the metropolitan council. The metropolitan council shall cause such ordinances, resolutions and plans to be reviewed by the planning staff of the metropolitan municipal corporation and return such ordinances, resolutions and plans, together with their findings and recommendations thereon within sixty days following their submission.

(3) To provide planning services for component cities and counties upon request and upon payment therefor by the cities or counties receiving such service.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.310. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 31.]